Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.080

Investment of funds of various systems.

The state investment board shall provide for the investment of all funds of the Washington public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the Washington public safety employees' retirement system, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, and the judges' retirement fund, pursuant to RCW 43.84.150, and may sell or exchange investments acquired in the exercise of that authority.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 21; 2004 c 242 s 45; 1998 c 341 s 504; 1981 c 3 s 34; 1977 ex.s. c 251 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.